FST/ckt/ckt_propn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+SG %+PL %+ANIM %+DAT %+DET %+INS %+ABS %+GEN %+ESS %+ABL %+PROPN %+INS %+PRO %+2 %+1 %+3


LEXICON Root

Proper_names ;
Pronouns ;

LEXICON Proper_names

Ларича       Pinf;
Виталина     Pinf;
Митя         Pinf;
Чаша         Pinf;
канчалан     Pinf;
Тымӈэԓӄот    Pinf;
Наташа       Pinf;
Катюша       Pinf;
Ыʼттъыгыргын Pinf;
Оʼмрытвааԓ   Pinf;
пэтька       Pinf;
Ильъя        Pinf;
Иван         Pinf;
Мэдвэдэв     Pinf;
Пэтька       Pinf;
Мачква       Pinf;
Абрамович    Pinf;
Тыӈэти       Pinf;
Оʼмрыквот    Pinf;
Ыʼттъуви     Pinf;
Каврагыргын  Pinf;
Жэня         Pinf;
Данилка      Pinf;
Канунникава  Pinf;
Тэӈыԓӄот     Pinf;
Тынарагтын   Pinf;
тыӈэк        Pinf;
омваам       Pinf;
Ԓетынтаграв  Pinf;


LEXICON Pinf

%+PROPN%+ABS%+SG:0   #;
%+PROPN%+DAT%+SG:^гты  #;
%+PROPN%+INS%+SG:^на   #;
%+PROPN%+ANIM%+INS:^тинэ   #;
%+PROPN%+ABL%+SG:0     #;


LEXICON Pronouns

тури       Prinf;
гыԓгын     Prinf;
гым        Prinf;
ымым       Prinf;
ытԓён      Prinf;
мури       Prinf;
ытԓён      Prinf;
омваам     Prinf;
гыт        Prinf;
Ԓетынтаграв Prinf;
ынӄэн        Prinf;

LEXICON Prinf

%+PRO%+PL%+2:0   #;
%+PRO%+SG%+2:^т   #;
%+PRO%+ANIM%+GEN%+SG%+1:^нин  #;
%+PRO%+DAT%+SG%+1:^ыкагты	#;
%+PRO%+SG%+1:^о   #;
%+PRO%+ABS%+SG%+3:0  #;
%+PRO%+ESS%+PL%+1:^к   #;
%+PRO%+ESS%+SG%+3:^к   #;
%+PRO%+DAT%+PL%+2:^эты    #;
%+PRO%+DAT%+SG%+2:^эты	#;
%+PRO%+ABS%+PL%+1:0     #;
%+PRO%+DAT%+SG%+2:^гты    #;
%+PRO%+GEN%+SG%+3:^нин  #;
%+PRO%+INS%+SG%+1:^нан    #;
%+DET%+INS%+SG:^атаӈ      #;
